Washington statutes.
RCW 35.42.050

Provisions to pay taxes, insurance, make repairs, improvements, etc.

A lease of a building may provide that as a part of the rental, the lessee city or town may pay taxes and assessments on the leased building, maintain insurance thereon for the benefit of the lessor, and assume responsibilities for repair, replacement, alterations, and improvements during the term of the lease.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.42.050. Prior: 1959 c 80 s 5.]